Connecticut, session 2026, HB05122.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
two million five hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall
be used by the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection
for the purpose of providing grants-in-aid to municipal and other local
fire departments for the provision of infrastructure-related
technological and electric upgrades to firehouses.